sv: Ljudanslutning: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Skärmport; HDMI; Micro USB; Optisk; USB; Wi-Fi; Övrigt
ko: 오디오 연결: 2.5mm; 3.5mm; 6.35mm; Bluetooth; 디스플레이 포트; HDMI; Micro USB; 광학; USB; Wi-Fi; 기타
el: Συνδεσιμότητα ήχου: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; DisplayPort; HDMI; Micro USB; Οπτικό καλώδιο; USB; Wi-Fi; Άλλο
pt-PT: Conectividade de áudio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Micro USB; Ótico; USB; Wi-Fi; Outro
pt-BR: Conectividade de áudio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Porta de exibição; HDMI; Micro USB; Óptica; USB; Wi-Fi; Outro
ja: オーディオ接続: 2.5mm; 3.5 mm; 6.35 mm; Bluetooth; ディスプレイポート; HDMI; Micro USB; 光学式; USB; Wi-Fi; その他
de: Audio-Konnektivität: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display-Port; HDMI; Micro USB; Optisch; USB; Wi-Fi; Sonstiges
pl: Łączność audio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Micro USB; Optyczne; USB; Wi-Fi; Inne
fi: Audioliitettävyys: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Näyttöportti; HDMI; Micro USB; Optinen; USB; Wi-Fi; Muu
it: Connettività audio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Micro USB; Ottico; USB; Wi-Fi; Altro
es: Conectividad de audio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Puerto de pantalla; HDMI; Micro USB; Óptico; USB; Wi-Fi; Otros
vi: Kết nối âm thanh: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Micro USB; Quang học; USB; Wi-Fi; Khác
th: การเชื่อมต่อเสียง: 2.5 มม.; 3.5 มม.; 6.35 มม.; บลูทูธ; พอร์ตแสดงผล; HDMI; ไมโคร USB; ออปติคัล; USB; Wi-Fi; อื่นๆ
da: Lydforbindelse: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Displayport; HDMI; Micro USB; Optisk; USB; Wi-Fi; Andet
lt-LT: Garso jungtys: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; „Bluetooth“; Ekrano prievadas; HDMI; „Micro USB“; Optinis; USB; Wi-Fi; Kita
ru: Подключение для воспроизведения звука: 2,5 мм; 3,5 мм; 6,35 мм; Bluetooth; Порт дисплея; HDMI; Micro USB; Оптический; USB; Wi-Fi; Другой
hr-HR: Audio povezivost: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; DisplayPort; HDMI; Micro USB; Optički; USB; Wi-Fi; Ostalo
bg-BG: Аудиосвързаност: 2,5 мм; 3,5 мм; 6,35 мм; Bluetooth; Порт за дисплей; HDMI; Micro USB; Оптичен; USB; Wi-Fi; Други
zh-CN: 音频连接: 2.5 毫米; 3.5 mm; 6.35 mm; 蓝牙; 显示端口; HDMI; Micro USB; 光学; USB; Wi-Fi; 其他
ro-RO: Conectivitate audio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Port de afișare; HDMI; Micro USB; Optic; USB; Wi-Fi; Altele
fr: Connection audio: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Port d’affichage; HDMI; Micro USB; Optique; USB; Wi-Fi; Autre
tr: Ses Bağlantısı: 2.5 mm; 3.5 mm; 6.35 mm; Bluetooth; DisplayPort; HDMI; Micro USB; Optik; USB; Wi-Fi; Diğer
sk-SK: Zvukové pripojenie: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Port displeja; HDMI; Micro USB; Optický; USB; Wi-Fi; Iné
hu: Hangcsatlakozás: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Kijelzőport; HDMI; Micro USB; Optikai; USB; Wi-Fi; Egyéb
nb: Lydtilkobling: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Displayport; HDMI; Micro USB; Optisk; USB; Wi-Fi; Annet
en: Audio connectivity: 2.5 mm; 3.5 mm; 6.35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Micro USB; Optical; USB; Wi-Fi; Other
sl-SI: Povezljivost zvoka: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Mikro USB; Optična; USB; Wi-Fi; Druga
nl: Audioconnectiviteit: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Displaypoort; HDMI; Micro-USB; Optisch; USB; Wifi; Andere
cs: Připojení zvuku: 2,5 mm; 3,5 mm; 6,35 mm; Bluetooth; Display port; HDMI; Micro USB; Optická; USB; Wi-Fi; Jiné
zh-TW: 音訊連接: 2.5 毫米; 3.5 毫米; 6.35 毫米; 藍牙; 顯示器連接埠; HDMI; 微型 USB; 光學; USB; Wi-Fi; 其他